Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.210

Licensee's bond to operate market—Amount determined by prior business operations—Minimum amount.

The sum of the bond to be executed by an applicant for a public livestock market license shall be determined in the following manner:

(1) Determine the dollar volume of business carried on, at, or through, such applicant's public livestock market in the twelve-month period prior to such applicant's application for a license.

(2) Divide such dollar volume of business by the number of official sale days granted such applicant's public livestock market, as herein provided, in the same twelve-month period provided for in subsection (1).

(3) Bond amount shall be that amount obtained by the formula in subsection (2) except that it shall not be an amount less than ten thousand dollars and if that amount shall exceed fifty thousand then that portion above fifty thousand shall be at the rate of ten percent of that value, except that the amount of the bond shall be to the nearest five thousand figure above that arrived at in the formula.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 192 s 6; 1959 c 107 s 21.]